California statutes. Penal Code
(a) The Department of Justice shall make accessible to law enforcement agencies, via a department bulletin and the California Law Enforcement Web, the commission’s “Guidelines For Handling Missing Persons Investigations” or any subsequent similar guidelines created by the commission, relating to the investigation of missing persons.

(b) By January 1, 2012, law enforcement agencies shall adopt a checklist document directing peace officers on investigation guidelines and resources available to them in the early hours of a missing person investigation. The commission’s “Guidelines For Handling Missing Persons Investigations” should be used as a model policy or example in developing the checklist document.

(c) By January 1, 2012, law enforcement agencies shall adopt a policy, regulations, or guidelines on missing persons investigations
 that are consistent with state and federal law. The commission’s “Guidelines For Handling Missing Persons Investigations” should be used as a model policy or example in developing the policy, regulations, or guidelines.

(d) By January 1, 2012, law enforcement agencies shall utilize, at a minimum, the department’s missing person reporting form for the initial contact with the parent or family member reporting a missing person.

(e) As necessary and appropriate, the commission shall modify its missing persons investigations guidelines and curriculum with contemporary information. Specifically, the commission should consider including and revising their guidelines to include both of the following:

(1) Steps for law enforcement agencies in the first few hours after the reporting of a missing person.

(2) Information on the availability of the department task forces, the SAFE Task Force Regional Teams, and other entities that can assist in the search for a missing person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 224, Sec. 2.   (AB 33)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13519.1.

(a) The commission shall implement by July 1, 1988, a course or courses of instruction for the training of law enforcement officers and law enforcement dispatchers in the handling of missing person and runaway cases and shall also develop guidelines for law enforcement response to missing person and runaway cases. The course or courses of instruction and the guidelines shall include, but not be limited to, timeliness and priority of response, assisting persons who make missing person reports to contact the appropriate law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction of the residence address of the missing person or runaway and the appropriate law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where the missing person or runaway was last seen, and coordinating law enforcement agencies for the purpose of efficiently and effectively taking and investigating missing person reports.

As used in this section, “law enforcement” includes any officers or employees of a local police or sheriff’s office or of the California Highway Patrol.

(b) The course of basic training for law enforcement officers and law enforcement dispatchers shall, not later than January 1, 1989, include adequate instruction in the handling of missing person and runaway cases developed pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) All law enforcement officers and law enforcement dispatchers who have received their basic training before January 1, 1989, shall participate in supplementary training on missing person and runaway cases, as prescribed and certified by the commission. The training required by this subdivision shall be completed not later than January 1, 1991.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 705, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13519.2.

(a) The commission shall, on or before July 1, 1990, include in the basic training course for law enforcement officers, adequate instruction in the handling of persons with developmental disabilities or mental illness, or both. Officers who complete the basic training prior to July 1, 1990, shall participate in supplementary training on this topic. This supplementary training shall be completed on or before July 1, 1992. Further training courses to update this instruction shall be established, as deemed necessary by the commission.

(b) The course of instruction relating to the handling of developmentally disabled or mentally ill persons shall be developed by the commission in consultation with appropriate groups and individuals having an interest and expertise in this area. In addition to providing instruction on the handling of these persons, the course shall also include information on the cause and nature of developmental disabilities and mental illness, as well as the community resources available to serve these persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 593, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13519.3.

(a) Effective July 1, 1990, the commission shall establish, for those peace officers specified in subdivision (a) of Section 13510 who are assigned to patrol or investigations, a course on the nature of sudden infant death syndrome and the handling of cases involving the sudden deaths of infants. The course shall include information on the community resources available to assist families and child care providers who have lost a child to sudden infant death syndrome. Officers who are employed after January 1, 1990, shall complete a course in sudden infant death syndrome prior to the issuance of the Peace Officer Standards and Training basic certificate, and shall complete training on this topic on or before July 1, 1992.

(b) The commission, in consultation with experts in the field of sudden infant death syndrome, shall prepare guidelines establishing standard procedures which may be followed by law enforcement agencies in the investigation of cases involving sudden deaths of infants.

(c) The course relating to sudden infant death syndrome and the handling of cases of sudden infant deaths shall be developed by the commission in consultation with experts in the field of sudden infant death syndrome. The course shall include instruction in the standard procedures developed pursuant to subdivision (b). In addition, the course shall include information on the nature of sudden infant death syndrome which shall be taught by experts in the field of sudden infant death syndrome.

(d) The commission shall review and modify the basic course curriculum to include sudden infant death syndrome awareness as part of death investigation training.

(e) When the instruction and training are provided by a local agency, a fee shall be charged sufficient to defray the entire cost of instruction and training.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1111, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

13519.4.

(a) The commission shall develop and disseminate guidelines and training for all peace officers in California as described in subdivision (a) of Section 13510 and who adhere to the standards approved by the commission, on the racial and cultural differences among the residents of this state. The course or courses of instruction and the guidelines shall stress understanding and respect for racial, identity, and cultural differences, and development of effective, noncombative methods of carrying out law enforcement duties in a diverse racial, identity, and cultural environment.

(b) The course of basic training for peace officers shall include adequate instruction on racial,
 identity, and cultural diversity in order to foster mutual respect and cooperation between law enforcement and members of all racial, identity, and cultural groups. In developing the training, the commission shall consult with appropriate groups and individuals having an interest and expertise in the field of racial, identity, and cultural awareness and diversity.

(c) For the purposes of this section the following shall apply:

(1) “Disability,” “gender,” “nationality,” “religion,” and “sexual orientation” have the same meaning as in Section 422.55.

(2) “Culturally diverse” and “cultural diversity” include, but are not limited to, disability, gender, nationality, religion, and sexual orientation issues.

(3) “Racial” has the same meaning as “race or ethnicity” in Section 422.55.

(4) “Stop” has the same meaning as in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 12525.5 of the Government Code.

(d) The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(1) The working men and women in California law enforcement risk their lives every day. The people of California greatly appreciate the hard work and dedication of peace officers in protecting public safety. The good name of these officers should not be tarnished by the actions of those few who commit discriminatory practices.

(2) Racial or identity profiling is
 a practice that presents a great danger to the fundamental principles of our Constitution and a democratic society. It is abhorrent and cannot be tolerated.

(3) Racial or identity profiling alienates people from law
 enforcement, hinders community policing efforts, and causes law enforcement to lose credibility and trust among the people whom law enforcement is sworn to protect and serve.

(4) Pedestrians, users of public transportation, and vehicular occupants who have been stopped, searched, interrogated, and subjected to a property seizure by a peace officer for no reason other than the color of their skin, national origin, religion, gender identity or expression, housing status, sexual orientation, or mental or physical disability are the victims of discriminatory practices.

(5) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting the changes to this section made by the act that added this paragraph that additional training is required to address the pernicious practice of racial or
 identity profiling and that enactment of this section is in no way dispositive of the issue of how the state should deal with racial or identity profiling.

(e) “Racial or identity profiling,” for purposes of this section, is the consideration of, or reliance on, to any degree, actual or perceived race, color, ethnicity, national origin, age, religion, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, or mental or physical disability in deciding which persons to subject to a stop or in deciding upon the scope or substance of law enforcement activities following a stop, except that an officer may consider or rely on characteristics listed in a specific suspect description. The activities include, but are not limited to, traffic or pedestrian stops, or actions during a stop, such as asking questions, frisks, consensual and nonconsensual
 searches of a person or any property, seizing any property, removing vehicle occupants during a traffic stop, issuing a citation, and making an arrest.

(f) A peace officer shall not engage in racial or identity profiling.

(g) Every peace officer in this state shall participate in expanded training as prescribed and certified by the Commission on Peace Officers Standards and Training.

(h) The curriculum shall be evidence-based and shall include and examine evidence-based patterns, practices, and protocols that make up racial or identity profiling, including implicit bias. This training shall prescribe evidence-based patterns, practices, and protocols that prevent racial or identity profiling. In developing the training, the
 commission shall consult with the Racial and Identity Profiling Advisory Board established pursuant to subdivision (j). The course of instruction shall include, but not be limited to, significant consideration of each of the following subjects:

(1) Identification of key indices and perspectives that make up racial, identity, and cultural differences among residents in a local community.

(2) Negative impact of intentional and implicit biases, prejudices, and stereotyping on effective law enforcement, including examination of how historical perceptions of discriminatory enforcement practices have harmed police-community relations and contributed to injury, death, disparities in arrest detention and incarceration rights, and wrongful convictions.

(3) The history and role of the civil and human rights movement and struggles and their impact on law enforcement.

(4) Specific obligations of peace officers in preventing, reporting, and responding to discriminatory or biased practices by fellow peace officers.

(5) Perspectives of diverse, local constituency groups and experts on particular racial, identity, and cultural and police-community relations issues in a local area.

(6) The prohibition against racial or identity profiling in subdivision (f).

(i) Once the initial basic training is completed, each peace officer in California as described in
 subdivision (a) of Section 13510 who adheres to the standards approved by the commission shall be required to complete a refresher course every five years thereafter, or on a more frequent basis if deemed necessary, in order to keep current with changing racial, identity, and cultural trends.

(j) (1) Beginning July 1, 2016, the Attorney General shall establish the Racial and Identity Profiling Advisory Board (RIPA) for the purpose of eliminating racial and identity profiling, and improving diversity and racial and identity sensitivity in law enforcement.

(2) RIPA shall include the following members:

(A) The Attorney General, or their designee.

(B) The President of the California Public Defenders Association, or their designee.

(C) The President of the California Police Chiefs Association, or their designee.

(D) The President of the California State Sheriffs’ Association, or their designee.

(E) The President of the Peace Officers Research Association of California, or their designee.

(F) The Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol, or their designee.

(G) A university professor who specializes in policing, and racial and identity equity.

(H) Two
 representatives of human or civil rights tax-exempt organizations who specialize in civil or human rights.

(I) Two representatives of community organizations who specialize in civil or human rights and criminal justice, and work with victims of racial and identity profiling. At least one representative shall be between 16 and 24 years of age.

(J) Two religious clergy members who specialize in addressing and reducing racial and identity bias toward individuals and groups.

(K) Up to two other members that the Governor may prescribe.

(L) Up to two other members that the President pro Tempore of the Senate may prescribe.

(M) Up to two other members that the Speaker of the Assembly may prescribe.

(3) Each year, on an annual basis, RIPA shall do the following:

(A) Analyze the data reported pursuant to Section 12525.5 of the Government Code and Section 13012 of this code.

(B) Analyze law enforcement training under this section.

(C) Work in partnership with state and local law enforcement agencies to review and analyze racial and identity profiling policies and practices across geographic areas in California.

(D) Conduct, and consult available, evidence-based research on intentional and implicit biases, and law
 enforcement stop, search, and seizure tactics.

(E) Issue a report that provides RIPA’s analysis under subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, and detailed findings on the past and current status of racial and identity profiling, and makes policy recommendations for eliminating racial and identity profiling. RIPA shall post the report on its internet website. Each report shall include disaggregated statistical data for each reporting law enforcement agency. The report shall include, at minimum, each reporting law enforcement agency’s total results for each data collection criterion under subdivision (b) of Section 12525.5 of the Government Code for each calendar year. The reports shall be retained and made available to the public by posting those reports on the Department of Justice’s OpenJustice web portal. The first annual report
 shall be issued no later than January 1, 2018. The reports are public records within the meaning of Section 7920.530 of the Government Code and are open to public inspection pursuant to Sections 7922.500 to 7922.545, inclusive, 7923.000, and 7923.005 of the Government Code.

(F) Hold at least three public meetings annually to discuss racial and identity profiling, and potential reforms to prevent racial and identity profiling. Each year, one meeting shall be held in northern California, one in central California, and one in southern California. RIPA shall provide the public with notice of at least 60 days before each meeting.

(4) Pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 12525.5 of the Government Code, RIPA shall advise the Attorney General in developing regulations for the collection
 and reporting of stop data, and ensuring uniform reporting practices across all reporting agencies.

(5) Members of RIPA shall not receive compensation, nor per diem expenses, for their services as members of RIPA.

(6) No action of RIPA shall be valid unless agreed to by a majority of its members.

(7) The initial terms of RIPA members shall be four years.

(8) Each year, RIPA shall elect two of its members as cochairpersons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 349.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

13519.41.

(a) The commission shall develop and implement a course of training regarding sexual orientation and gender identity minority groups in this state. In developing the training, the commission shall consult with sexual orientation and gender identity minority members of law enforcement and the community who have expertise in the area of sexual orientation and gender identity, including at least one male, one female, and one transgender person.

(b) The course of training for officers and dispatchers described in subdivision (a) shall be incorporated into the course or courses of basic training for law enforcement officers and dispatchers and shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) The difference between sexual orientation and gender identity and how these two aspects of identity relate to each other and to race, culture, and religion.

(2) The terminology used to identify and describe sexual orientation and gender identity.

(3) How to create an inclusive workplace within law enforcement for sexual orientation and gender identity minorities.

(4) Important moments in history related to sexual orientation and gender identity minorities and law enforcement.

(5) How law enforcement can respond effectively to domestic violence and hate crimes involving sexual orientation and gender identity minorities.

(c) Law enforcement officers, administrators,
 executives, and dispatchers may participate in supplementary training that includes all of the topics described in this section. The supplementary training shall fulfill the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training requirements for continuing professional training and shall include facilitated discussions and learning activities, including scenario training exercises. Additional training courses to update this instruction shall be established as deemed necessary by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 969, Sec. 1.   (AB 2504)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

13519.5.

The commission shall, on or before July 1, 1991, implement a course or courses of instruction to provide ongoing training to the appropriate peace officers on methods of gang and drug law enforcement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 333, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

13519.6.

(a) (1) The commission, in consultation with subject-matter experts, including, but not limited to, law enforcement agencies, civil rights groups, and academic experts, and the Department of Justice, shall develop guidelines and a course of instruction and training for law enforcement officers who are employed as peace officers, or who are not yet employed as a peace officer but are enrolled in a training academy for law enforcement officers, addressing hate crimes. “Hate crimes,” for purposes of this section, has the same meaning as in Section 422.55.

(2) The commission shall consult with the subject-matter experts in paragraph (1) if the guidelines or course of
 instruction are updated.

(3) The guidelines and course of instruction developed pursuant to this section are not regulations as that term is used in the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 commencing with Section 11340 of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code). This paragraph is declaratory of existing law.

(b) The course shall make maximum use of audio and video communication and other simulation methods and shall include instruction in each of the following:

(1) Indicators of hate crimes.

(2) The impact of these crimes on the victim, the victim’s family, and the community, and the assistance and compensation available to victims.

(3) Knowledge of the laws dealing with hate crimes and the legal rights of, and the remedies available to, victims of hate crimes.

(4) Law enforcement procedures, reporting, and documentation of hate crimes.

(5) Techniques and methods to handle incidents of hate crimes in a noncombative manner.

(6) Multimission criminal extremism, which means the nexus of certain hate crimes, antigovernment extremist crimes, anti-reproductive-rights crimes, and crimes committed in whole or in part because of the victims’ actual or perceived homelessness.

(7) The special problems inherent in some categories of hate crimes,
 including gender-bias crimes, disability-bias crimes, including those committed against homeless persons with disabilities, anti-immigrant crimes, and anti-Arab and anti-Islamic crimes, and techniques and methods to handle these special problems.

(8) Preparation for, and response to, anti-Arab, anti-Middle Eastern, anti-Islamic, anti-LGBTQ, anti-Black, anti-Native American, anti-immigrant, anti-Asian American and Pacific Islander, and anti-Jewish hate crime waves, and any other future hate crime waves that the Attorney General determines are likely.

(9) Identifying when a gun violence restraining order may be an appropriate tool for preventing hate crimes and the procedures for seeking a gun violence restraining order.

(c) The guidelines developed by the commission shall incorporate the procedures and techniques specified in subdivision (b) and shall include the model hate crimes policy framework for use by law enforcement agencies in adopting a hate crimes policy pursuant to Section 422.87. The elements of the model hate crimes policy framework shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A message from the law enforcement agency’s chief executive officer to the agency’s officers and staff concerning the importance of hate crime laws and the agency’s commitment to enforcement.

(2) The definition of “hate crime” in Section 422.55.

(3) References to hate crime statutes including Section 422.6.

(4) A title-by-title specific protocol that agency personnel are required to follow, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Preventing and preparing for likely hate crimes by, among other things, establishing contact with persons and communities who are likely targets, and forming and cooperating with community hate crime prevention and response networks.

(B) Responding to reports of hate crimes, including reports of hate crimes committed under the color of authority.

(C) Accessing assistance, by, among other things, activating the Department of Justice hate crime rapid response protocol when necessary.

(D) Providing victim assistance and followup, including community followup.

(E) Reporting.

(5) A list of all requirements that Section 422.87 or any other law mandates a law enforcement agency to include in its hate crime policy.

(d) (1) The course of training leading to the basic certificate issued by the commission shall include the course of instruction described in subdivision (a).

(2) Every state law enforcement and correctional agency, and every local law enforcement and correctional agency to the extent that this requirement does not create a state-mandated local program cost, shall provide its peace officers with the basic course of instruction as revised pursuant to the act that amends this section in the 2003–04 session of the Legislature, beginning with officers who have not previously received the training. Correctional agencies shall adapt the course as necessary.

(e) (1) The commission shall, subject to an appropriation of funds for this purpose in the annual Budget Act or other statute,
 for any basic course, incorporate the November 2017 video course developed by the commission entitled “Hate Crimes: Identification and Investigation,” or any successor video, into the basic course curriculum.

(2) The commission shall make the video course described in paragraph (1) available to stream via the learning portal.

(3) Each peace officer shall, within one year of the commission making the course available to stream via the learning portal, be required to complete the November 2017 video facilitated course developed by the commission entitled “Hate Crimes: Identification and Investigation,” the course identified in paragraph (4), or any other commission-certified hate crimes course via the learning portal or in-person instruction.

(4) The commission shall develop and periodically update an interactive course of instruction and training for in-service peace officers on the topic of hate crimes and make the course available via the learning portal. The course shall cover the fundamentals of hate crime law and preliminary investigation of hate crime incidents, and shall include updates on recent changes in the law, hate crime trends, and best enforcement practices.

(5) The commission shall require the course described in paragraph (3) to be taken by in-service peace officers every six years.

(f) As used in this section, “peace officer” means any person designated as a peace officer by Section 830.1 or 830.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 532, Sec. 1.   (AB 2621)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13519.64.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that research, including “Special Report to the Legislature on Senate Resolution 18: Crimes Committed Against Homeless Persons” by the Department of Justice and “Hate, Violence, and Death: A Report on Hate Crimes Against People Experiencing Homelessness from 1999–2002” by the National Coalition for the Homeless demonstrate that California has had serious and unaddressed problems of crime against homeless persons, including homeless persons with disabilities.

(b) (1) By July 1, 2005, the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, using available funding, shall develop a two-hour telecourse to be made available to all law enforcement agencies in California on crimes against homeless persons and on how to deal effectively and humanely with homeless persons, including homeless persons with disabilities. The telecourse shall include information on multimission criminal extremism, as defined in Section 13519.6. In developing the telecourse, the commission shall consult subject-matter experts including, but not limited to, homeless and formerly homeless persons in California, service providers and advocates for homeless persons in California, experts on the disabilities that homeless persons commonly suffer, the California Council of Churches, the National Coalition for the Homeless, the Senate Office of Research, and the Criminal Justice Statistics Center of the Department of Justice.

(2) Every state law enforcement agency, and every local law enforcement agency, to the extent that this requirement does not create a state-mandated local program cost, shall provide the telecourse to its peace officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 700, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

13519.7.

(a) On or before August 1, 1994, the commission shall develop complaint guidelines to be followed by city police departments, county sheriffs’ departments, districts, and state university departments, for peace officers who are victims of sexual harassment in the workplace. In developing the complaint guidelines, the commission shall consult with appropriate groups and individuals having an expertise in the area of sexual harassment.

(b) The course of basic training for law enforcement officers shall, no later than January 1, 1995, include instruction on sexual harassment in the workplace. The training shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) The definition of sexual harassment.

(2) A description of sexual harassment, utilizing examples.

(3) The illegality of sexual harassment.

(4) The complaint process, legal remedies, and protection from retaliation available to victims of sexual harassment.

In developing this training, the commission shall consult with appropriate groups and individuals having an interest and expertise in the area of sexual harassment.

(c) All peace officers who have received their basic training before January 1, 1995, shall receive supplementary training on sexual harassment in the workplace by January 1, 1997.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 126, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

13519.8.

(a) (1) The commission shall implement a course or courses of instruction for the regular and periodic training of law enforcement officers in the handling of high-speed vehicle pursuits and shall also develop uniform, minimum guidelines for adoption and promulgation by California law enforcement agencies for response to high-speed vehicle pursuits. The guidelines and course of instruction shall stress the importance of vehicle safety and protecting the public at all times, include a regular assessment of law enforcement’s vehicle pursuit policies, practices, and training, and recognize the need to balance the known offense and the need for immediate capture against the risks to officers and other citizens of a high-speed pursuit. These guidelines shall be a resource for each agency executive to use in the creation of a specific pursuit policy that the agency is encouraged to adopt and promulgate, and that reflects the needs of the agency, the jurisdiction it serves, and the law.

(2) As used in this section, “law enforcement officer” includes any peace officer of a local police or sheriff’s department or the California Highway Patrol, or of any other law enforcement agency authorized by law to conduct vehicular pursuits.

(b) The course or courses of basic training for law enforcement officers and the guidelines shall include adequate consideration of each of the following subjects:

(1) When to initiate a pursuit.

(2) The number of involved law enforcement units permitted.

(3) Responsibilities of primary and secondary law enforcement units.

(4) Driving tactics.

(5) Helicopter assistance.

(6) Communications.

(7) Capture of suspects.

(8) Termination of a pursuit.

(9) Supervisory responsibilities.

(10) Blocking, ramming, boxing, and roadblock procedures.

(11) Speed limits.

(12) Interjurisdictional considerations.

(13) Conditions of the vehicle, driver, roadway, weather, and traffic.

(14) Hazards to uninvolved bystanders or motorists.

(15) Reporting and postpursuit analysis.

(c) (1) All law enforcement officers who have received their basic training before January 1, 1995, shall participate in supplementary training on high-speed vehicle pursuits, as prescribed and certified by the commission.

(2) Law enforcement agencies are encouraged to include, as part of their advanced officer training program, periodic updates and training on high-speed vehicle pursuit. The commission shall assist where possible.

(d) (1) The course or courses of instruction, the learning and performance objectives, the standards for the training, and the guidelines shall be developed by the commission in consultation with appropriate groups and individuals having an interest and expertise in the field of high-speed vehicle pursuits. The groups and individuals shall include, but not be limited to, law enforcement agencies, police academy instructors, subject matter experts, and members of the public.

(2) The commission, in consultation with these groups and individuals, shall review existing training programs to determine the ways in which high-speed pursuit training may be included as part of ongoing programs.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that each law enforcement agency adopt, promulgate, and require regular and periodic training consistent with an agency’s specific pursuit policy that, at a minimum, complies with the guidelines developed under subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 485, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

13519.9.

(a) On or before January 1, 1995, the commission shall establish the Robert Presley Institute of Criminal Investigation which will make available to criminal investigators of California’s law enforcement agencies an advanced training program to meet the needs of working investigators in specialty assignments, such as arson, auto theft, homicide, and narcotics.

(b) The institute shall provide an array of investigation training, including the following:

(1) Core instruction in matters common to all investigative activities.

(2) Advanced instruction through foundation specialty courses in the various investigative specialties.

(3) Completion of a variety of elective courses pertaining to investigation.

(c) (1) Instruction in core foundation and specialty courses shall be designed not only to impart new knowledge, but to evoke from students the benefit of their experience and ideas in a creative and productive instructional design environment.

(2) Instructors shall be skilled and knowledgeable both in subject matter and in the use of highly effective instructional strategies.

(d) (1) The commission shall design and operate the institute to constantly improve the effectiveness of instruction.

(2) The institute shall make use of the most modern instructional design and equipment, including computer-assisted instruction, scenarios, and case studies.

(3) The institute shall ensure that proper facilities, such as crime scene training areas, are available for use by students.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 43, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

13519.10.

(a) (1) The commission shall implement a course or courses of instruction for the regular and periodic training of law enforcement officers in the use of force and shall also develop uniform, minimum guidelines for adoption and promulgation by California law enforcement agencies for use of force. The guidelines and course of instruction shall stress that the use of force by law enforcement personnel is of important concern to the community and law enforcement and that law enforcement should safeguard life, dignity, and liberty of all persons, without prejudice to anyone. These guidelines shall be a resource for each agency executive to use in the creation of the use of force policy that the agency is required to adopt and
 promulgate pursuant to Section 7286 of the Government Code, and that reflects the needs of the agency, the jurisdiction it serves, and the law.

(2) As used in this section, “law enforcement officer” includes any peace officer of a local police or sheriff’s department or the California Highway Patrol, or of any other law enforcement agency authorized by law to use force to effectuate an arrest.

(b) The course or courses of the regular basic course for law enforcement officers and the guidelines shall include all of the following:

(1) Legal standards for use of force.

(2) Duty to intercede.

(3) The use of objectively reasonable force.

(4) Supervisory responsibilities.

(5) Use of force review and analysis.

(6) Guidelines for the use of deadly force.

(7) State required reporting.

(8) De-escalation and interpersonal communication training, including tactical methods that use time, distance, cover, and concealment, to avoid escalating situations that lead to violence.

(9) Implicit and explicit bias and cultural competency.

(10) Skills including
 de-escalation techniques to effectively, safely, and respectfully interact with people with disabilities or behavioral health issues.

(11) Use of force scenario training including simulations of low-frequency, high-risk situations and calls for service, shoot-or-don’t-shoot situations, and real-time force option decisionmaking.

(12) Alternatives to the use of deadly force and physical force, so that de-escalation tactics and less lethal alternatives are, where reasonably feasible, part of the decisionmaking process leading up to the consideration of deadly force.

(13) Mental health and policing, including bias and stigma.

(14) Using public service, including the
 rendering of first aid, to provide a positive point of contact between law enforcement officers and community members to increase trust and reduce conflicts.

(c) Law enforcement agencies are encouraged to include, as part of their advanced officer training program, periodic updates and training on use of force. The commission shall assist where possible.

(d) (1) The course or courses of instruction, the learning and
 performance objectives, the standards for the training, and the guidelines shall be developed by the commission in consultation with appropriate groups and individuals having an interest and expertise in the field on use of force. The groups and individuals shall include, but not be limited to, law enforcement agencies, police academy instructors, subject matter experts, and members of the public.

(2) The commission, in consultation with these groups and individuals, shall review existing training programs to determine the ways in which use of force training may be included as part of ongoing programs.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that each law enforcement agency adopt, promulgate, and require regular and periodic training consistent with an agency’s
 specific use of force policy that, at a minimum, complies with the guidelines developed under subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 59.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13519.12.

(a) Pursuant to Section 13510, the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training shall establish training standards and develop a course of instruction that includes the criteria for the curriculum content recommended by the Curriculum Development Advisory Committee established pursuant to Section 8588.10 of the Government Code, involving the responsibilities of first responders to terrorism incidents. The course of instruction shall address the training needs of peace officers at a managerial or supervisory level and below who are assigned to field duties. The training shall be developed in consultation with the Department of Justice and other individuals knowledgeable about terrorism and address